Connecticut, session 2026, HB05197.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
To amend title 17b of the general statutes to (1) set equivalent income
eligibility standards for adults age nineteen and over in the HUSKY A,
C and D programs, and (2) eliminate consideration of assets in eligibility
determinations.